Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-415
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that adopt a standard for labeled commercial fertilizer products to qualify for the nitrogen reduction incentive program and may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act.

Laws 2024, LB1368, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 9.
December 31, 2029